Louisiana, session 2026, HB381.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 51:2771(C)(3) is hereby enacted to read as follows:
§2771. High Impact Jobs Program; fund
* * *
C.
* * *
(3)(a) A company that has twenty percent or more of Louisiana employees
who qualify for the Supplemental Nutrition Assistance Program, shall be ineligible
for participation in the High Impact Jobs Program.
(b) LED shall coordinate with the Louisiana Department of Health to access
the required information to implement this Paragraph.
* * *
Page 1 of 2
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-888 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 381